Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201254-626
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection
Act:

(1) Animal control facility means a facility operated by or
under contract with the state or any political subdivision of the state for
the purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned,
or unwanted animals;

(2) Animal rescue means a person or group of persons who hold
themselves out as an animal rescue, accept or solicit for dogs or cats with
the intention of finding permanent adoptive homes or providing lifelong care
for such dogs or cats, or who use foster homes as the primary means of housing
dogs or cats;

(3) Animal shelter means a facility used to house or contain
dogs or cats and owned, operated, or maintained by an incorporated humane
society, an animal welfare society, a society for the prevention of cruelty
to animals, or another nonprofit organization devoted to the welfare, protection,
and humane treatment of such animals;

(4) Boarding kennel means a facility which is primarily used
to house or contain dogs or cats owned by persons other than the operator
of such facility. The primary function of a boarding kennel is to temporarily
harbor dogs or cats when the owner of the dogs or cats is unable to do so
or to provide training, grooming, or other nonveterinary service for consideration
before returning the dogs or cats to the owner. A facility which provides
such training, grooming, or other nonveterinary service is not a boarding
kennel for the purposes of the act unless dogs or cats owned by persons other
than the operator of such facility are housed at such facility overnight.
Veterinary clinics, animal control facilities, animal rescues, and nonprofit
animal shelters are not boarding kennels for the purposes of the act;

(5) Breeding dog means
any sexually intact male or female dog six months of age or older owned or
harbored by a commercial dog breeder;

(6) Cat means any animal which is wholly or
in part of the species Felis domesticus;

(7) Commercial cat breeder means a person
engaged in the business of breeding cats:

(a) Who sells, exchanges, leases, or in any way transfers
or offers to sell, exchange, lease, or transfer thirty-one or more cats in a twelve-month
period beginning on April 1 of each year;

(b) Who owns or harbors four or more cats, intended for breeding, in a twelve-month
period beginning on April 1 of each year;

(c) Whose cats produce a total of four or more litters within a twelve-month
period beginning on April 1 of each year; or

(d) Who knowingly sells, exchanges, or leases cats for later retail sale or brokered
trading;

(8) Commercial
dog breeder means a person engaged in the business of breeding dogs:

(a) Who sells,
exchanges, leases, or in any way transfers or offers to sell, exchange, lease,
or transfer thirty-one or more dogs in a twelve-month period beginning on
April 1 of each year;

(b) Who owns or harbors four or more dogs, intended for breeding,
in a twelve-month period beginning on April 1 of each year;

(c) Whose dogs
produce a total of four or more litters within a twelve-month period beginning
on April 1 of each year; or

(d) Who knowingly sells, exchanges, or leases
dogs for later retail sale or brokered trading;

(9) Dealer means any person who is not a commercial dog or cat breeder or a pet
shop but is engaged in the business of buying for resale or selling or exchanging
dogs or cats as a principal or agent or who claims to be so engaged. A person
who purchases, sells, exchanges, or leases thirty or fewer dogs or cats in
a twelve-month period is not a dealer;

(10) Department means the
Bureau of Animal Industry of the Department of Agriculture with the State
Veterinarian in charge, subordinate only to the director;

(11) Director means the Director
of Agriculture or his or her designated employee;

(12) Dog means any animal
which is wholly or in part of the species Canis familiaris;

(13) Foster home means any
person who provides temporary housing for twenty or fewer dogs or cats that
are six months of age or older in any twelve-month period and is affiliated
with a person operating as an animal rescue that uses foster homes as its
primary housing of dogs or cats. To be considered a foster home, a person
shall not participate in the acquisition of the dogs or cats for which temporary
care is provided. Any foster home which houses more than twenty dogs or cats
that are six months of age or older in any twelve-month period or who participates
in the acquisition of dogs or cats shall be licensed as an animal rescue;

(14) Housing facility means
any room, building, or areas used to contain a primary enclosure;

(15) Inspector means any person
who is employed by the department and who is authorized to perform inspections
pursuant to the act;

(16) Licensee means a person
who has qualified for and received a license from the department pursuant
to the act;

(17) Pet animal means an animal
kept as a household pet for the purpose of companionship, which includes,
but is not limited to, dogs, cats, birds, fish, rabbits, rodents, amphibians,
and reptiles;

(18) Pet shop means a retail
establishment which sells pet animals and related supplies;

(19) Premises means all public
or private buildings, kennels, pens, and cages used by a facility and the
public or private ground upon which a facility is located if such buildings,
kennels, pens, cages, or ground are used by the owner or operator of such
facility in the usual course of business;

(20) Primary enclosure means
any structure used to immediately restrict a dog or cat to a limited amount
of space, such as a room, pen, cage, or compartment;

(21) Secretary of Agriculture
means the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States Department of Agriculture;

(22) Stop-movement order means
a directive preventing the movement or removal of any dog or cat from the
premises; and

(23) Unaltered means any male
or female dog or cat which has not been neutered or spayed or otherwise rendered
incapable of reproduction.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 233, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 274, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1002, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB241, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB910, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB427, § 2.